Arkansas, session 2025, HB1156.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 24-7-710(b)(1)(A)(i), concerning survivor
annuity benefits for surviving spouses under the Arkansas Teacher Retirement
System, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1)(A)(i) Unless the active member otherwise directs an alternative
beneficiary to receive the member’s residue with a payable balance by using a
beneficiary form approved by the system, the active member's surviving
spouse, who was married to the active member for at least the two (2) years
one (1) year immediately preceding the active member's death, shall receive
an annuity computed in the same manner in all respects as if the active
member had retired on the date of the active member's death and elected
Option A under § 24-7-706 to provide one hundred percent (100%) survivor
annuity benefits, including benefits applicable under § 24-7-713, for his or
her surviving spouse.
*LJH004*
01/16/2025 9:20:35 AM LJH004

HB1156

SECTION 2. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the operations of a state
public retirement system are complex; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement
System must be able to meet the needs of its members as anticipated by the
General Assembly; that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement
System Act, § 24-7-201 et seq., need immediate revision and updating to
address administrative complexities caused by these provisions and to bring
these provisions into conformance with sound public pension policy and
actuarial requirements; that the revisions and updates are of great
importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other
citizens of the State of Arkansas; that as the Arkansas Teacher Retirement
System operates on a fiscal year of July 1 to June 30, an effective date of
July 1, 2025, is necessary in order to allow the provisions within this act
to begin on the first day of the fiscal year and to allow for a structured
and proper administration of the procedures referenced in this act; that the
updates and revisions to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are of
great importance and necessary for protecting member benefits and clarifying
the reporting and contribution requirements of employers participating in the
Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; and that this act is necessary in order
to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas
Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and
this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health,
and safety, shall become effective on July 1, 2025.












01/16/2025 9:20:35 AM LJH004